District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.64

Repealed

Procedure for merger.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 206, ch. 269, § 64
Oct. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-117, § 2, 25 DCR 1509
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.64.
1981 Ed., § 29-364.
1973 Ed., § 29-927.